Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.062

Falsification—Penalty.

Any employer, member or beneficiary who shall knowingly make false statements or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the retirement system in an attempt to defraud the retirement system, is guilty of a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 217; 1972 ex.s. c 131 s 10. Formerly RCW 41.26.300.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Severability—1972 ex.s. c 131: See note following RCW 41.26.030.